src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Z1prop_tptZ
+Prop+Abs+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:@U.Num.Sg@ Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:@U.Num.Pl@%>it Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatiga Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataa Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatini Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aaterput Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itarput Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatersi Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itarsi Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataat Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaat Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatertik Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itartik Krestr ; 
+Prop+Rel+Sg@U.Num.Sg@:@U.Num.Sg@%>ip Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Pl@U.Num.Pl@:@U.Num.Pl@%>it Krestr ; 
+Prop+Rel+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-p Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatima Krestr ; 
+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aativit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataata Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimi Krestr ; 
+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitta Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatta Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissi Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%itassi Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataata Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>ertaata Krestr ;  
+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatimik Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itamik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Pl:%>inut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnut TrmVb ;  
+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanut TrmVb ;  
+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminut TrmVb ;  
+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnut TrmVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsinnut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnut TrmVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassinnut TrmVb ; 
+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannut TrmVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaannut TrmVb ;  
+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnut TrmVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itaminnut TrmVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmit AblVb ; 
+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>init AblVb ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mit AblVb ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnit AblVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsinnit AblVb ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnit AblVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassinnit AblVb ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannit AblVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaannit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnit AblVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itaminnit AblVb ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmiit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abl+Pl:%>iniit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-miit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinniit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinniit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataaniit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminiit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinniit Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsinniit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinniit Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassinniit Krestr ; 
+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataanniit Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaanniit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminniit Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itaminniit Krestr ;  
+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmi LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mi LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Pl:%>ini LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinni LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinni LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataani LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimini LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinni LokVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsinni LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinni LokVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassinni LokVb ;
+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataanni LokVb ;
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaanni LokVb ; 
+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminni LokVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itaminni LokVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>tut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>itut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Pl:%>itut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>ituut Krestr ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-tuut Krestr ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatittut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatittut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataatut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimisut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsitut AeqVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsitut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissitut AeqVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassitut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataattut AeqVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaattut AeqVb ;  
+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatimittut AeqVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itamittut AeqVb ; 
+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%TRUNCmmik Krestr ; 
+Prop+Ins+Pl:%>inik Krestr ; 
+Prop+Ins+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-mik Krestr ; 
+Prop+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatinnik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatinnik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataanik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatiminik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsinnik Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsinnik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissinnik Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassinnik Krestr ; 
+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataannik Krestr ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaannik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatiminnik Krestr ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itaminnik Krestr ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg:%>ikkut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Pl:%>itigut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg+Orth/Alt:%>-kkut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>aatikkut ViaVb ; 
+Prop+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>aatikkut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataagut ViaVb ; 
+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>aataatigut ViaVb ; 
+Prop+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>aatimigut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>aatitsigut ViaVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>itatsigut ViaVb ;  
+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>aatissigut ViaVb ;  
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>itassigut ViaVb ; 
+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>aataatigut ViaVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>itaatigut ViaVb ; 
+Prop+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>aatimikkut ViaVb ; 
+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>itamikkut ViaVb ; 


! URL's
! =====
